Utah statutes.
9-3-604.   Member or employee -- Disclosure of interest.
(1)  A member or employee of the authority who has, will have, or later
acquires an interest, direct or indirect, in a transaction with the authority
shall immediately disclose the nature and extent of that interest in writing
to the authority as soon as the individual has knowledge of the actual or
prospective interest.
(2)  The disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the authority.
(3)  After making the disclosure, the member or employee may participate in
any action by the authority authorizing the transaction.
